District of Columbia statutes.
31-1352

Ancillary summary proceedings.

The Commissioner, in his or her sole discretion, may institute proceedings under §§ 31-1308 and 31-1309 at the request of the commissioner or other appropriate insurance official of the domiciliary state of any foreign or alien insurer having property located in the District.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 53, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-2852.